Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 49 Georgia Council on Lupus Education and Awareness

31-49-1.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds and declares that it is estimated that as many as 55,000 Georgia residents suffer from lupus, a life-long autoimmune disease in which the immune system becomes unbalanced, causing inflammation, tissue damage, seizures, strokes, heart attacks, miscarriages, and organ failure. Although anyone can develop lupus, it strikes mostly women of childbearing age; African American, Hispanic, Asian, and Native American women are two to three times more likely than Caucasians to develop lupus. Lupus can be difficult to diagnose and often is misdiagnosed because the symptoms are similar to those of other illnesses. It is in the public interest for this state to establish an entity to develop and implement a comprehensive program to improve education and awareness about lupus for health care providers and the general public.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-49-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 397, § 2/SB 352.

31-49-2.
Creation of Council on Lupus Education and Awareness; membership; organization.

There is created the Georgia Council on Lupus Education and Awareness within the Department of Community Health.

The council shall consist of six members as follows:

The commissioner of community health, or the commissioner’s designee, as an ex officio member;

Three members to be appointed by the Governor. The Governor shall appoint two members to serve for one year and one to serve for two years. Thereafter, successors to such initial appointees shall serve for two years. Of these three members, one shall be a physician who treats patients with lupus and one shall be a lupus patient;

One member to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives to serve for two years; and

One member to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor to serve for two years;

All vacancies on the council shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment. A member of the council shall be eligible for reappointment.

The members of the council shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for any expenses incurred by them in the performance of their duties, subject to the availability of funds.

The council shall organize as soon as practicable after the appointment of its members and shall select a chairperson from among its members.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-49-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 397, § 2/SB 352.

31-49-3.
Duties and responsibilities of council.

The council shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

To initially investigate the level of education concerning lupus in this state; and

Based on the results of its initial investigation pursuant to paragraph (1) of this Code section, to develop information on lupus endorsed by government agencies, including, but not limited to, the National Institutes of Health and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

The council shall develop a directory of lupus related health care services, which shall be made available on the department’s website and shall include a list of health care providers specializing in the diagnosis and treatment of lupus.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-49-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 397, § 2/SB 352.

31-49-4.
Distribution of information.

The department shall post the information developed by the council pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 31-49-3 on its website.

Subject to appropriations or access to other private or public funds, the department may distribute such information to individuals with lupus, their family members, health care professionals, hospitals, local health departments, schools, agencies on aging, employers, health plans, women’s health groups, and nonprofit and community based organizations.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-49-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 397, § 2/SB 352.

31-49-5.
Annual report.

The council shall prepare annually a complete and detailed report to be submitted no later than October 1 to the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination detailing the activities of the council and may include any recommendations for legislative action it deems appropriate.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-49-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 397, § 2/SB 352; Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-16/HB 186.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “no later than October 1 to the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination” for “to the Governor, the chairperson of the House Committee on Health and Human Services, and the chairperson of the Senate Health and Human Services Committee” in the middle of this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-1/HB 186, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This part shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Health Act.’ ”

31-49-6.
Donations.

The council may solicit and accept donations, gifts, grants, property, or matching funds from any public or private source for the use of the council in performing its functions under this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-49-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 397, § 2/SB 352.